Washington statutes.
RCW 6.25.190

Discharge of attachment—Bond—Judgment on bond.

If the defendant, at any time before judgment, causes a bond to be executed to the plaintiff with sufficient sureties, to be approved by the officer having the attachment or after the return thereof by the clerk, conditional on the performance of the judgment of the court, the attachment shall be discharged and restitution made of property taken or proceeds thereof. The execution of such bond shall be deemed an appearance of such defendant to the action. The bond shall be part of the record and, if judgment goes against the defendant, the judgment shall be entered against the defendant and the sureties.

[ 1987 c 442 s 819; 1886 p 45 s 29; RRS s 671. Prior: Code 1881 ss 174-192; 1877 pp 35-40; 1873 pp 43-50; 1871 pp 9, 10; 1869 pp 41-47; 1863 pp 112-120; 1860 pp 30-36; 1854 pp 155-162. Formerly RCW 7.12.250.]